Maryland, session 2025, HB0751.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Local Government
4–416.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding § 4–104(f) of this title, if an area is annexed to a
municipality that has planning and zoning authority at the time of annexation, the
municipality shall have exclusive jurisdiction over planning, subdivision control, and
zoning in the area annexed.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0751*

HOUSE BILL 751
(2) Paragraph (1) of this subsection does not grant any planning or zoning
power or subdivision control to a municipality that is not authorized to exercise planning
or zoning power or subdivision control at the time of annexation.
(b) Without the express approval of the county commissioners or county council
of the county in which the municipality is located, for 5 years after an annexation by a
municipality, the municipality may not allow development of the annexed land for land
uses substantially different than the authorized use, or at a substantially higher density,
not exceeding 50%, than could be granted for the proposed development, in accordance with
the [zoning classification of the county] LAND USE RECOMMENDATIONS IN THE
COMPREHENSIVE PLAN OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY applicable at the time of
the annexation.
(c) Notwithstanding § 4–204 of the Land Use Article and if the county expressly
approves, the municipality may place the annexed land in a zoning classification that
allows a land use or density different from the land use or density specified in the [zoning
classification of the county or agency with planning and zoning jurisdiction over the land
prior to its annexation] LAND USE RECOMMENDATIONS IN THE COMPREHENSIVE PLAN
OF THE COUNTY OR MUNICIPALITY applicable at the time of the annexation.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.